Hawaii statutes.
§431:10A-312 Severability. If any
provision of this part or the application thereof to any person or
circumstances is for any reason held to be invalid, the remainder of the part
and the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances shall
not be affected thereby. [L 1989, c 195, §5]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next